Indiana, session 2026, HB1400.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-1-34-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) As used in this section, "child care facility"
means any of the following:
(1) A child care center (as defined in IC 12-7-2-28.4).
(2) A child care home (as defined in IC 12-7-2-28.6).
(b) A group or association of child care facilities may establish
a multiple employer welfare arrangement.
(c) Not later than September 1, 2026, the department shall
create a survey requesting the following information from child
care facilities:
(1) The name of the child care facility that is responding to the
survey.
(2) Whether the child care facility is interested in establishing
a multiple employer welfare arrangement.
(3) The child care facility's current insurance costs for
accident and sickness and death benefits.
2026 IN 1400—LS 6949/DI 141


The department must publish the survey on the department's
website.
(d) The department shall notify the office of the secretary of
family and social services when the survey is published on the
department's website. Not later than fourteen (14) calendar days
after receiving notice from the department under this subsection,
the office of the secretary of family and social services shall send a
direct link to the survey by electronic mail to each child care
facility.
(e) The department shall:
(1) facilitate communication between child care facilities that
express an interest in establishing a multiple employer welfare
arrangement; and
(2) advise the child care facilities on best practices for
lowering insurance costs.
2026 IN 1400—LS 6949/DI 141